Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1139.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Police and Community Safety Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds as follows:(1) Immigrants are valuable and essential members of this Commonwealth.(2) A relationship of trust between Pennsylvania's immigrant community and State and local agencies is central to the public safety of the people of this Commonwealth.(3) This trust is threatened when State and local agencies are entangled with Federal immigration enforcement, 12345678910111213141516171819 with the result that immigrant community members fear approaching police when they are victims of and witnesses to crimes, seeking basic health services or attending school, to the detriment of public safety and the well-being of all residents of this Commonwealth.(4) Entangling State and local agencies with Federal immigration enforcement programs diverts already limited resources and blurs the lines of accountability between Federal, State and local governments.(5) State and local participation in Federal immigration enforcement programs also raises constitutional concerns, including the prospect that Commonwealth residents could be detained in violation of the Fourth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, targeted on the basis of race or ethnicity in violation of the Equal Protection Clause or denied access to education based on immigration status.(6) This act seeks to ensure effective policing to protect the safety, well-being and constitutional rights of the residents of this Commonwealth and to direct the State's limited resources to matters of greatest concern to State and local governments.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Civil immigration warrant." A warrant for a violation of Federal civil immigration law. The term includes a civil immigration warrant entered in the National Crime Information Center database."Federal immigration authority." An officer, employee or 20260SB1139PN1404 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person otherwise paid by or acting as an agent of a Federal agency that primarily enforces immigration laws or the United States Customs and Border Protection, or any division thereof, or other officer, employee or person otherwise paid by or acting as an agent of the United States Department of Homeland Security who is charged with immigration enforcement."Hold request." A request, by a Federal agency that primarily enforces immigration laws, that a local law enforcement agency maintain custody of an individual currently in the local law enforcement agency's custody beyond the time the individual would otherwise be eligible for release in order to facilitate transfer to the Federal agency. The term includes the United States Department of Homeland Security."Immigration enforcement." An effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a Federal civil immigration law. The term includes an effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a Federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person's presence in, entry or reentry to or employment in, the United States, including a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1253 (relating to penalties related to removal), 1324c (relating to penalties for document fraud), 1325 (relating to improper entry by alien) or 1326 (relating to reentry of removed aliens)."Joint law enforcement task force." A law enforcement agency collaborating, engaging or partnering with a Federal law enforcement agency in investigating, interrogating, detaining, detecting or arresting persons for violations of Federal or State criminal offenses."Judicial warrant." A warrant based on probable cause and issued by a Federal judge or a United States magistrate judge 20260SB1139PN1404 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 who authorizes a Federal immigration authority to take into custody the individual who is the subject of the warrant."Law enforcement agency." A State or local law enforcement agency. The term includes school police and a security department of a public school."Notification request." A request, by a Federal agency that primarily enforces immigration laws, that a local law enforcement agency inform a Federal agency of the release date and time in advance of an individual in the local law enforcement agency's custody. The term includes DHS Form I-247N."Public schools." All public elementary and secondary schools under the jurisdiction of the Department of Education, charter schools, the State-related universities, universities within the State System of Higher Education and community colleges of this Commonwealth."Transfer request." A request, by a Federal agency that primarily enforces immigrations laws, that a local law enforcement agency facilitate the transfer of an individual in the local law enforcement agency's custody to the Federal agency. The term includes DHS Form I-247X.Section 4. Prohibited action by law enforcement agencies.(a) Prohibitions.--Law enforcement agencies may not do any of the following:(1) Use agency or department money, facilities, property, equipment or personnel to investigate, interrogate, detain, detect or arrest persons for immigration enforcement purposes, including any of the following:(i) Inquiring into or collecting information about an individual's immigration status, except as required to comply with 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(5) (relating to unlawful 20260SB1139PN1404 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acts).(ii) Detaining an individual on the basis of a hold request.(iii) Responding to a notification request or a transfer request.(iv) Providing or responding to requests for nonpublicly available personal information about an individual, including information about the individual's release date, home address or work address for immigration enforcement purposes.(v) Making arrests based on civil immigration warrants.(vi) Giving a Federal immigration authority access to individuals in agency or department custody for immigration enforcement purposes.(vii) Performing the functions of an immigration officer, whether under 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) (relating to powers of immigration officers and employees) or any other law, regulation or policy, whether formal or informal.(2) (i) Make agency or department databases, including databases maintained for the agency or department by private vendors, or the information in the databases other than information regarding an individual's citizenship or immigration status, available to any person for the purpose of immigration enforcement.(ii) An agreement in existence on the effective date of this section that conflicts with the terms of this paragraph is terminated.(iii) A person or entity provided access to an 20260SB1139PN1404 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency or department database shall certify in writing that the database will not be used for the purposes prohibited by this section.(3) Place peace officers under the supervision of Federal agencies or employ peace officers deputized as special Federal officers or special Federal deputies, except to the extent those peace officers remain subject to the laws of this Commonwealth, governing conduct of peace officers and the policies of the employing agency.(4) Use a Federal immigration authority as an interpreter for law enforcement matters relating to individuals in agency or department custody.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a law enforcement agency from doing any of the following:(1) Responding to a request from a Federal immigration authority for information about a specific person's criminal history, including previous criminal arrests, convictions and similar criminal history information where otherwise permitted by State law.(2) Participating in a joint law enforcement task force so long as the purpose of the joint law enforcement task force is not immigration enforcement.(c) Reports relating to joint law enforcement task forces.--(1) If a law enforcement agency chooses to participate in a joint law enforcement task force, the law enforcement agency shall submit a report every six months to the Office of Attorney General, as specified by the Attorney General.(2) The reporting agency or the Attorney General may determine that a report, in whole or in part, is not a public 20260SB1139PN1404 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 record for the purposes of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, to prevent the disclosure of sensitive information, including an ongoing operation or a confidential informant.(d) Report by Attorney General.--(1) The Attorney General, within 14 months after the effective date of this section and twice a year thereafter, shall report on the type and frequency of joint law enforcement task forces. The report shall include, for the reporting period, assessments on compliance with subsection (b)(2):(i) a list of all law enforcement agencies that participate in joint law enforcement task forces;(ii) a list of joint law enforcement task forces operating in this Commonwealth and their purposes;(iii) the number of arrests made associated with joint law enforcement task forces for the violation of Federal or State crimes; and(iv) the number of arrests made associated with joint law enforcement task forces for the purpose of immigration enforcement by all joint law enforcement task force participants, including Federal law enforcement agencies.(2) The Attorney General shall post the reports required by this subsection on the Attorney General's publicly accessible Internet website.(e) Judicial warrant required for certain acts.--A law enforcement agency may not transfer an individual to a Federal immigration authority for purposes of immigration enforcement or detain an individual at the request of the Federal immigration 20260SB1139PN1404 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority for purposes of immigration enforcement absent a judicial warrant.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or restrict a government entity or official from sending to or receiving from a Federal immigration authority information regarding the citizenship or immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of an individual under 8 U.S.C. §§ 1373 (relating to communication between government agencies and the Immigration and Naturalization Service) and 1644 (relating to communication between State and local government agencies and Immigration and Naturalization Service).Section 5. Policies limiting assistance with immigration enforcement.(a) Duty of Attorney General.--The Attorney General, within three months after the effective date of this subsection, in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, shall publish model policies limiting assistance with immigration enforcement to the fullest extent possible consistent with Federal and State law at public schools, health facilities operated by the State or a political subdivision, courthouses and shelters and that the public schools, health facilities, courthouses and shelters remain safe and accessible to all residents of this Commonwealth, regardless of immigration status.(b) Adoption of policies.--(1) Public schools and health facilities operated by the State or a political subdivision and courthouses shall adopt one of the model policies published in accordance with subsection (a) or an equivalent policy.(2) All other organizations and entities that provide services related to physical or mental health and wellness, 20260SB1139PN1404 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 education or access to justice are encouraged to adopt the model policy.Section 6. Release of inmates.(a) State correctional institutions.--(1) The Pennsylvania Parole Board and the Department of Corrections shall notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation of the scheduled release of all persons confined to State correctional institutions serving a term for the conviction of a crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses).(2) The notification shall be made at least 60 days prior to the scheduled release date or as soon as practicable if notification cannot be provided at least 60 days prior to release.(3) The only nonpublicly available personal information that the notification may include is the name of the person who is scheduled to be released and the scheduled date of release.(b) County correctional institutions.--(1) Whenever a person confined to a county correctional institution is serving a term for the conviction of an offense and has a prior conviction for a crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) or has a prior felony conviction in another jurisdiction for an offense that has all the elements of a crime of violence, the chief administrator of the county correctional institution may notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation of the scheduled release of the person, provided that no local law or policy prohibits the sharing of the information with either the Federal Bureau of Investigation or Federal immigration 20260SB1139PN1404 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorities.(2) The notification may be made up to 60 days prior to the scheduled release date.(3) The only nonpublicly available personal information that the notification may include is the name of the person who is scheduled to be released and the scheduled date of release.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1139PN1404 - 10 - 123456789